test/src/morphology/N-sihkihp_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - sihkihp - ok : # -m animate noun, blackbird
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg: sihkihp
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl: sihkihpwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Loc: sihkihpihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg: sihkihpsis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl: sihkihpsisak

     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisihkihp
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisihkihp
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: osihkihp
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg: osihkihpyiw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisihkihpnân
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisihkihpnân
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: oniskâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl: osihkihpyiw

     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisihkihpak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisihkihpak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg: osihkihpa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg: osihkihpyiwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisihkihpnânak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisihkihpnawak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisihkihpwâwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl: osihkihpwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl: osihkihpyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: nisihkihpisis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kisihkihpisis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: osihkihpisis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: osihkihpisisiyiw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: nisihkihpisisinân
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kisihkihpisisinaw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kisihkihpisisiwâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: osihkihpisisiwâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: osihkihpisisiyiw

     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: nisihkihpisisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kisihkihpisisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: osihkihpisisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: osihkihpisisiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: nisihkihpisisinâna
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kisihkihpisisinawa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kisihkihpisisiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: osihkihpisisiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl: osihkihpisisiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nisihkihpihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kisihkihpihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: osihkihpihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: osihkihpiyihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisihkihpinânihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kisihkihpinâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisihkihpiwâwihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osihkihpiwâwihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: osihkihpiyihk

     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Px1Sg+Loc: nisihkihpisisihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Px2Sg+Loc: kisihkihpisisihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Px3Sg+Loc: osihkihpisisihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Px3iSg+Loc: osihkihpsisiyihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Px1Pl+Loc: nisihkihpisisnânihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Px12Pl+Loc: kisihkihpsisinâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Px2Pl+Loc: kisihkihpisiswâwihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Px3Pl+Loc: osihkihpisiswâwihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Dim+Px3iPl+Loc: osihkihpisisiyihk
